New Jersey, session 221, S3245.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  (1)  The board of education of a school district, which offers a 403(b) plan to eligible school district employees pursuant to section 403(b) of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. s.403(b)), shall select a minimum of six financial institutions or pension management organizations to provide investment services to the 403(b) plan.  The board of education shall ensure that, in selecting financial institutions or pension management organizations pursuant to this section, eligible school district employees are provided sufficient opportunities to invest in annuity contracts, as authorized pursuant to section 403(b)(1) of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. s.403(b)(1)), or custodial accounts, as authorized pursuant to section 403(b)(7) of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. s.403(b)(7)).  The board shall also ensure that employees are offered self-directed investment options.  If fewer than six financial institutions or pension management organizations are determined to be available, then the board of education shall select the number of available providers able to meet the requirements of this section. (2)  Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection to the contrary, the board of education of a school district with a student enrollment of less than 1,000 students, which offers a 403(b) plan to eligible school district employees, may select fewer than six financial institutions or pension management organizations to provide investment services to the 403(b) plan; provided, however, that the board shall ensure that, in selecting the financial institutions or pension management organizations, eligible school district employees are provided sufficient opportunities to invest in annuity contracts or custodial accounts and that the employees are offered self-directed investment options. (3)  The selection of financial institutions or pension management organizations pursuant to this section shall be a mandatory subject of collective negotiations between a board of education, which offers a 403(b) plan to eligible school district employees, and an applicable collective bargaining unit in accordance with section 2 of this act. b.  A financial institution or pension management organization selected by a board of education pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall not also be selected as a third party administrator for a 403(b) plan offered by the board. c.     A financial institution or pension management organization selected to provide services to a board of education pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall: (1)   enter into an agreement with the board of education requiring the financial institution or pension management organization to provide in an electronic format all data necessary to evaluate the investment of 403(b) plan funds as determined by the board of education; and (2)   provide all data required by the board of education to facilitate disclosure of all fees, charges, expenses, commissions, compensation, and payments to third parties related to investments offered under the 403(b) plan. d.  A board of education and the majority representative of the employees in an applicable collective bargaining unit shall not be responsible for: (1)  any investment loss incurred under the 403(b) plan; (2)  the failure of any investment to earn any specific or expected return; and (3)  the failure of any investment to earn as much as any other investment opportunity or to cost less than any other investment opportunity, regardless of whether the other opportunity was offered to participants in the 403(b) plan. 2.  The following shall be mandatory subjects of collective negotiations between a board of education, which offers a 403(b) plan to eligible school district employees pursuant to section 403(b) of the federal Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. s.403(b)), and an applicable collective bargaining unit: a.  the selection of financial institutions or pension management organizations to provide services to the 403(b) plan in accordance with section 1 of this act; and b.  the ability of an eligible school district employee to deposit supplemental compensation for accumulated unused sick leave, not to exceed the maximum amount of supplemental compensation permitted pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2010, c.3 (C.18A:30-3.6) as applicable, into a 403(b) plan account. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.